New York, session 2025-2026, S9488.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 7905 of the education law, as 2 amended by chapter 460 of the laws of 2011 and paragraph (c) as added by 3 chapter 329 of the laws of 2012, is amended to read as follows: 4 (1) The following persons shall be eligible for a limited permit: 5 (a) An applicant who meets all requirements for admission to the 6 licensing examination for an occupational therapist [who has graduated 7 from an occupational therapy curriculum with a baccalaureate degree or 8 certificate in occupational therapy which is substantially equivalent to 9 a baccalaureate degree satisfactory to the board of occupational thera- 10 py] and in accordance with the commissioner's regulations; or 11 (b) A foreign occupational therapist who is in this country on a non- 12 immigration visa for the continuation of occupational therapy study, 13 pursuant to the exchange student program of the United States Department 14 of State. 15 (c) An applicant who meets all requirements for admission to the 16 licensing examination for an occupational therapy assistant [who has 17 graduated from an accredited occupational therapy assistant curriculum 18 with an associate's degree satisfactory to the board of occupational 19 therapy] and in accordance with the commissioner's regulations. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15268-01-6